Maryland, session 2026, HB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1375*

HOUSE BILL 1375
(2) “CLINICAL DIAGNOSIS” MEANS THE OBSERVATION BY A LICENSED
PHYSICIAN OF SIGNS AND SYMPTOMS COMPATIBLE WITH ACUTE, PERSISTENT, OR
CHRONIC INFECTION OR OTHER CHRONIC MANIFESTATIONS OF LYME DISEASE.
(3) (I) “LONG–TERM ANTIBIOTIC TREATMENT” MEANS THE
ADMINISTRATION OF ORAL, INTRAMUSCULAR, OR INTRAVENOUS ANTIBIOTIC
MEDICATIONS FOR LONGER THAN 4 WEEKS.
(II) “LONG–TERM ANTIBIOTIC TREATMENT” INCLUDES
SEPARATE AND COMBINATION ADMINISTRATIONS OF ANTIBIOTIC MEDICATIONS.
(4) “LYME DISEASE” INCLUDES ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE CLINICAL DIAGNOSIS OF A PATIENT BY A LICENSED
PHYSICIAN OF THE PRESENCE OF SIGNS OR SYMPTOMS COMPATIBLE WITH AN ACUTE
INFECTION WITH BORRELIA BURGDORFERI;
(II) LATE–STAGE, PERSISTENT, OR CHRONIC INFECTION WITH
BORRELIA BURGDORFERI;
(III) COMPLICATIONS RELATED TO AN INFECTION WITH
BORRELIA BURGDORFERI;
(IV) AN INFECTION BY OTHER STRAINS OF BORRELIA THAT
BECOME IDENTIFIED OR RECOGNIZED BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL
AND PREVENTION AS A CAUSE OF LYME DISEASE;
(V) AN INFECTION THAT MEETS THE SURVEILLANCE CRITERIA
FOR LYME DISEASE SET FORTH BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND
PREVENTION; AND
(VI) A CLINICAL DIAGNOSIS OF LYME DISEASE THAT DOES NOT
MEET THE SURVEILLANCE CRITERIA SET FORTH BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE
CONTROL AND PREVENTION BUT PRESENTS OTHER ACUTE, PERSISTENT, OR
CHRONIC SIGNS OR SYMPTOMS OF LYME DISEASE AS DETERMINED BY A LICENSED
PHYSICIAN, WHETHER THAT DIAGNOSIS IS BASED ONLY ON KNOWLEDGE OBTAINED
THROUGH MEDICAL HISTORY AND PHYSICAL EXAMINATION OR IN CONJUNCTION
WITH TESTING THAT PROVIDES SUPPORTIVE DATA OF THE DIAGNOSIS.
(5) “RELATED TICK–BORNE ILLNESS” MEANS BARTONELLOSIS,
BABESIOSIS, EHRLICHIOSIS, ANAPLASMOSIS, PIROPLASMOSIS, OR ANY OTHER
TICK–BORNE ILLNESS THAT MAY BE ASSOCIATED WITH LYME DISEASE.

HOUSE BILL 1375 3
(6) “THERAPEUTIC PURPOSE” MEANS THE USE OF ANTIBIOTICS TO
CONTROL THE SYMPTOMS OF LYME DISEASE AND OTHER RELATED
TICK–BORNE ILLNESSES.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, SURGICAL, OR PHARMACEUTICAL BENEFITS TO
INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER A HEALTH
INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, SURGICAL, OR PHARMACEUTICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS
OR GROUPS UNDER CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) IF THE LONG–TERM ANTIBIOTIC TREATMENT OF LYME DISEASE AND
RELATED TICK–BORNE ILLNESSES HAS BEEN ORDERED BY A LICENSED TREATING
PHYSICIAN FOR THERAPEUTIC PURPOSES, AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR THE FULL LENGTH OF THE
LONG–TERM ANTIBIOTIC TREATMENT TO BE ADMINISTERED IN THE MANNER
PRESCRIBED BY THE LICENSED TREATING PHYSICIAN; AND
(2) MAY NOT IMPOSE A QUANTITATIVE LIMITATION ON THE
LONG–TERM ANTIBIOTIC TREATMENT.
(D) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT DENY COVERAGE FOR
TREATMENT OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE FOR BENEFITS UNDER THIS SECTION SOLELY
BECAUSE THE TREATMENT MAY BE CATEGORIZED AS UNPROVEN, EXPERIMENTAL,
OR INVESTIGATIONAL IN NATURE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.